vi: Cấu hình điểm neo: Điểm neo kép; Nhiều điểm neo có thể điều chỉnh; Điểm neo đơn; Khác
nb: Ankerkonfigurasjon: Doble forankringspunkter; Flere justerbare forankringspunkter; Ett forankringspunkt; Annet
hr-HR: Konfiguracija sidra: Dvostruke sidrišne točke; Više prilagodljivih sidrišnih točaka; Jedna sidrišna točka; Ostalo
th: รูปแบบการจัดวางจุดยึด: จุดยึดคู่; จุดยึดปรับได้หลายจุด; จุดยึดเดี่ยว; อื่นๆ
ru: Конфигурация крепления: Двойные точки крепления; Несколько регулируемых точек крепления; Одинарная точка крепления; Другое
fr: Configuration d’ancrage: Deux points d’ancrage; Multiples points d’ancrage réglables; Point d’ancrage unique; Autre
en: Anchor configuration: Dual anchor points; Multiple adjustable anchor points; Single anchor point; Other
pt-PT: Configuração do ponto de ancoragem: Dois pontos de ancoragem; Vários pontos de ancoragem ajustáveis; Ponto de ancoragem único; Outro
sl-SI: Konfiguracija sidra: Dvojna sidrišča; Več nastavljivih sidrišč; Enojno sidrišče; Drugo
ko: 앵커 구성: 이중 앵커 포인트; 다중 조절식 앵커 포인트; 단일 앵커 포인트; 기타
bg-BG: Конфигурация на закрепване: Две точки на закрепване; Множество регулируеми точки на закрепване; Една точка на закрепване; Друго
sk-SK: Konfigurácia kotvy: Dva kotviace body; Viaceré nastaviteľné kotviace body; Jeden kotviaci bod; Iná
zh-TW: 錨點配置: 雙固定點; 多個可調式固定點; 單一固定點; 其他
ro-RO: Configurația ancorei: Puncte de ancorare duble; Puncte de ancorare multiple ajustabile; Punct de ancorare simplu; Altele
de: Ankerkonfiguration: Zwei Ankerpunkte; Mehrere einstellbare Ankerpunkte; Ein Ankerpunkt; Sonstige
da: Ankerkonfiguration: Dobbelte forankringspunkter; Flere justerbare forankringspunkter; Enkelt forankringspunkt; Andet
cs: Konfigurace kotvení: Dva kotevní body; Více nastavitelných kotevních bodů; Jeden kotevní bod; Jiné
zh-CN: 锚点配置: 双锚点; 多个可调锚点; 单锚点; 其他
it: Configurazione dell'ancora: Punti di ancoraggio doppi; Punti di ancoraggio multipli regolabili; Punto di ancoraggio singolo; Altro
es: Configuración de anclaje: Puntos de anclaje dobles; Múltiple puntos de anclaje ajustables; Punto de anclaje único; Otro
sv: Ankarkonfiguration: Dubbla förankringspunkter; Flera justerbara förankringspunkter; Enkel förankringspunkt; Annan
nl: Ankerconfiguratie: Dubbele ankerpunten; Meerdere verstelbare ankerpunten; Enkel ankerpunt; Overig
pl: Konfiguracja punktów mocowania: Podwójne punkty kotwiczenia; Wiele regulowanych punktów kotwiczenia; Pojedynczy punkt kotwiczenia; Inne
ja: アンカー構造: デュアルアンカーポイント; 複数の調整可能なアンカーポイント; シングルアンカーポイント; その他
el: Διαμόρφωση αγκύρωσης: Διπλά σημεία αγκύρωσης; Πολλαπλά ρυθμιζόμενα σημεία αγκύρωσης; Μονό σημείο αγκύρωσης; Άλλο
hu: Horgony konfigurációja: Kettős rögzítési pont; Több, állítható rögzítési pont; Egy rögzítési pont; Egyéb
fi: Kiinnityksen kokoonpano: Kaksi ankkuripistettä; Useita säädettäviä ankkuripisteitä; Yksi ankkuripiste; Muu
tr: Çapa yapılandırması: Çift bağlantı noktası; Birden fazla ayarlanabilir bağlantı noktası; Tek bağlantı noktası; Diğer
lt-LT: Inkaro konfigūracija: Dvigubi tvirtinimo taškai; Keli reguliuojami tvirtinimo taškai; Vienas tvirtinimo taškas; Kita
pt-BR: Configuração da âncora: Dois pontos de ancoragem; Múltiplos pontos de ancoragem ajustáveis; Um ponto de ancoragem; Outro